Washington statutes.
RCW 11.98.017

Trusteeship—Accepting and declining—Powers without acceptance.

(1) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (3) of this section, a person designated as trustee accepts the trusteeship:

(a) By substantially complying with a method of acceptance provided in the terms of the trust; or

(b) If the terms of the trust do not provide a method of acceptance or the method provided in the terms is not expressly made exclusive, by accepting delivery of the trust property, exercising powers or performing duties as trustee, or otherwise indicating acceptance of the trusteeship.

(2) A person designated as trustee who has not yet accepted the trusteeship may decline the trusteeship by delivering a written declination of the trusteeship to the trustor or, if the trustor is deceased or is incapacitated, to a successor trustee, if any, and if none, to a qualified beneficiary.

(3) A person designated as trustee, without accepting the trusteeship, may:

(a) Act to preserve the trust property if, within a reasonable time after acting, the person sends a written declination of the trusteeship to the trustor or, if the trustor is dead or is incapacitated, to a successor trustee, if any, and if none, to a qualified beneficiary; and

(b) Inspect or investigate trust property to determine potential liability under environmental or other law or for any other purpose.

[ 2013 c 272 s 10.]

NOTES:

Application—2013 c 272: See note following RCW 11.98.002.